Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PROHIBITION ON USE OF FUNDS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Use of funds. new text end new text begin Funding for state-sponsored health programs must not be used for funding abortions, except to the extent necessary for continued participation in a federal program. This subdivision applies only to state-sponsored health programs that are administered by the commissioner of human services. For purposes of this section, abortion has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 144.343, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin If any one or more provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this section or the application of it to any person or circumstance is found to be unconstitutional, that provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or word is severable and the balance of this section remains effective notwithstanding such unconstitutionality. The legislature intends that it would have passed each provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or word irrespective of the fact that any one provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or word is declared unconstitutional. new text end